src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON x_21_oi ! Kommentaari: var ja jok dialektissa oon sg gen "aurinkon" ja sg nom "kuninkas" s.72 norjankielisessä grammatiikissa. 
  +Sg      :                   nom_end         ;
  +Pl      :^WG                nom_t           ;
  +Sg      :^WG                gen_n_sg        ;
  +Sg+Dial/Por:                   par_V           ;
  +Sg+Dial/Jok:                   par_A           ;
  +Sg+Dial/Var:                   par_A           ;
  +Sg      :^HMETA             ill_hVVn        ;
  +Sg      :                   ess_nnA         ; ! paivukkonna
  +Sg      :^WG                sgpl_cases_odd  ; ! these two lexica for cases with

  +Pl      :^WG^AO%>i2         gen_tten        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^WG^AO%>i2      par_tA          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^WG^AO%>i2      par_tA          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^WG^AO%>i2      par_tA          ;
  +Pl      :^HMETA             ill_hVin        ;
!          +Pl:^AO%>i2            ill_hin         ; ! TODO, only for asioihin, not the others?
  +Pl      :^WG^AO%>i2         ess_nA          ; ! paivukoina
  +Pl      :^WG^AO%>i2         com_ne          ; ! paivukoine
  +Pl      :^WG^AO%>i2         sgpl_cases_even ; ! the same affix in sg and pl
!      +Pl+Ill:^AO^HMETA%>h^V%>i2 n_PxK           ;
         !+Ill:         %>h^V%>i2 n_PxK           ;
!+Ill:h%>i2%>i2     n_PxK ; ! on Sg:ssä hVVn


! n_31_ee ! vanha_n_23
! n_31_lainasana_ee ! vanha_n_23
! n_31_ii ! vanha_n_23ii


LEXICON n_21_oi_pl        !!= * @CODE@  Pahkilot
+N         : x_21_oi_pl ;

LEXICON x_21_oi_pl !  
  +Pl      :^WG                nom_t           ;
  +Pl      :^WG^AO%>i2         gen_tten        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^WG^AO%>i2      par_tA          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^WG^AO%>i2      par_tA          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^WG^AO%>i2      par_tA          ;
  +Pl      :^HMETA             ill_hVin        ;
!          +Pl:^AO%>i2            ill_hin         ; ! TODO, only for asioihin, not the others?
  +Pl      :^WG^AO%>i2         ess_nA          ; ! paivukoina
  +Pl      :^WG^AO%>i2         com_ne          ; ! paivukoine
  +Pl      :^WG^AO%>i2         sgpl_cases_even ; ! the same affix in sg and pl
!      +Pl+Ill:^AO^HMETA%>h^V%>i2 n_PxK           ;
         !+Ill:         %>h^V%>i2 n_PxK           ;
!+Ill:h%>i2%>i2     n_PxK ; ! on Sg:ssä hVVn


! n_31_ee ! vanha_n_23
! n_31_lainasana_ee ! vanha_n_23
! n_31_ii ! vanha_n_23ii

LEXICON n_21_oi_AO_odd       !!= * @CODE@  Mustikka, kulkkiija, sivakka, asia (in Var) ! Loppuu a:han!!!!
+N         : x_21_oi_AO ;
+N+Pl      :^AO^HMETA          ill_hVin        ;

LEXICON n_21_oi_AO_odd_pl       !!= * @CODE@  Mustikka, kulkkiija, sivakka, asia (in Var) ! Loppuu a:han!!!!
+N         : x_21_oi_AO_pl ;
+N+Pl      :^AO^HMETA          ill_hVin        ;

LEXICON n_21_oi_ÄÖ_odd        !!= * @CODE@  Kynttilä, tekkiijä, jyrinä - Loppuu ä:hän!!!!
+N         : x_21_oi_AO ;
+N+Pl      :^AO^HMETA          ill_höin        ;

LEXICON n_21_oi_ÄÖ_odd_pl        !!= * @CODE@  Kynttilä, tekkiijä, jyrinä - Loppuu ä:hän!!!!
+N         : x_21_oi_AO_pl ;
+N+Pl      :^AO^HMETA          ill_höin        ;

LEXICON x_21_oi_AO_pl            ! odd
  +Pl      :^WG                nom_t           ;
  +Pl      :^WG^AO%>i2         gen_tten        ;
  +Pl      :^WG^AO%>i2         par_tA          ; 
  +Pl      :^WG^AO%>i2         ess_nA          ; 
  +Pl      :^WG^AO%>i2         com_ne          ; 
  +Pl      :^WG^AO%>i2         sgpl_cases_even ;
  
LEXICON x_21_oi_AO            ! odd
  +Sg      :                   nom_end         ;
  +Pl      :^WG                nom_t           ;
  +Sg      :^WG                gen_n_sg        ;
  +Sg+Dial/Por:                   par_V        ;
  +Sg+Dial/Jok:                   par_A        ;
  +Sg+Dial/Var:                   par_A        ;
  +Sg      :^HMETA             ill_hVVn        ;
  +Sg      :                   ess_nnA         ; 
  +Sg      :^WG                sgpl_cases_odd  ; 

  +Pl      :^WG^AO%>i2         gen_tten        ;
  +Pl      :^WG^AO%>i2         par_tA          ; 
  +Pl      :^WG^AO%>i2         ess_nA          ; 
  +Pl      :^WG^AO%>i2         com_ne          ; 
  +Pl      :^WG^AO%>i2         sgpl_cases_even ;

LEXICON n_21_oi_AO_even        !!= * @CODE@  kuunteliija
+N         : x_21_oi_AO_even ;
+N+Pl      :^AO^HMETA          ill_hVin        ;

LEXICON n_21_oi_ÄÖ_even        !!= * @CODE@  käveliijä
+N         : x_21_oi_AO_even ;
+N+Pl      :^AO^HMETA          ill_höin        ;

LEXICON x_21_oi_AO_even
  +Sg      :                   nom_end         ;
  +Pl      :^WG                nom_t           ;
  +Sg      :^WG                gen_n_sg        ;
  +Sg+Dial/Por:                   par_V        ;
  +Sg+Dial/Jok:                   par_A        ;
  +Sg+Dial/Var:                   par_A        ;
  +Sg      :^HMETA             ill_hVVn        ;
  +Sg      :                   ess_nA          ; 
  +Sg      :^WG                sgpl_cases_even ; 

  +Pl      :^WG^AO%>i2         gen_tten        ;
  +Pl      :^WG^AO%>i2         par_tA          ; 
  +Pl      :^WG^AO%>i2         ess_nA          ; 
  +Pl      :^WG^AO%>i2         com_ne          ; 
  +Pl      :^WG^AO%>i2         sgpl_cases_even ;

LEXICON n_31_ee        !!= * @CODE@  hoppee:hoppe
+N+Dial/Por:        x_31_ee            ;
+N+Dial/Var:^E2I^¤  x_31_ia          ;
+N+Dial/Jok:^¤      x_31_ia          ; ! hopea, not hopia
! TODO TODO TODO this is where it might be going wrong
! Need to distinguish hoppee (silvery) and hoppee (silver)
! Also for Valkkee (white) and valkke (a fire or something similar) TODO TODO TODO
 ! +N+Sg+Nom:   R     Is this extra and wrong?

LEXICON x_31_ee ! for Por
x_31_ee_nomsg ;
x_31_ee_oblique ;

LEXICON x_31_ee_nomsg 
  +Sg+Nom:e       K               ;
!  +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:%>^WG^A   K    ;

LEXICON x_31_ee_oblique 
  +Sg      :e       gen_n_sg        ;
  +Sg+Dial/-Var:e   par_tA          ;
  +Sg      :e       ill_sseen       ;
  +Sg      :e       ess_nA          ;
  +Sg      :e       sgpl_cases_even ;

  +Pl      :e       nom_t           ;
  +Pl      :e%>i2   gen_tten        ;
  +Pl      :e%>i2   par_tA          ;
  +Pl      :e%>i2   ill_ssiin       ;
  +Pl      :e%>i2   ess_nA          ;
  +Pl      :e%>i2   com_ne          ;
  +Pl      :e%>i2   sgpl_cases_even ;

LEXICON n_31_yy        !!= * @CODE@  revyy
+N+Dial/Por:        x_31_yy            ;

LEXICON x_31_yy ! for Por
x_31_yy_nomsg ;
x_31_yy_oblique ;

LEXICON x_31_yy_nomsg 
  +Sg+Nom:y       K               ;
!  +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:%>^WG^A   K    ;

LEXICON x_31_yy_oblique 
  +Sg      :y       gen_n_sg        ;
  +Sg+Dial/-Var:y   par_tA          ;
  +Sg      :y       ill_sseen       ;
  +Sg      :y       ess_nA          ;
  +Sg      :y       sgpl_cases_even ;

  +Pl      :y       nom_t           ;
  +Pl      :y%>i2   gen_tten        ;
  +Pl      :y%>i2   par_tA          ;
  +Pl      :y%>i2   ill_ssiin       ;
  +Pl      :y%>i2   ess_nA          ;
  +Pl      :y%>i2   com_ne          ;
  +Pl      :y%>i2   sgpl_cases_even ;


LEXICON x_31_ia ! For -Por only valkia, hopia, kauhia
  +Sg+Nom  :%>^A         K               ; ! valkia
  +Sg      :%>^A         gen_n_sg        ; ! valkian
  +Sg      :%>^A         par_A           ; ! valkiaa
  +Sg+Dial/Jok:%>^At        par_A           ; ! valkiata
  +Sg      :             ill_hAAn        ; ! valkihaan
  +Sg      :%>^A         ess_nnA         ; ! valkianna pime^A>nn^A
  +Sg      :%>^A         sgpl_cases_odd  ;

  +Pl      :%>^A         nom_t           ; ! valkiat
  +Pl      :%>i2         gen_tten        ; ! valkeitten
  +Pl      :%>i2         par_tA          ; ! valkeita
  +Pl      :%>i2         ill_ssiin       ; ! valkeissiin
  +Pl      :%>i2         ess_nA          ; ! valkeina
  +Pl      :%>i2         com_ne          ; ! valkeine
  +Pl      :%>i2         sgpl_cases_even ; ! valkei-
 
 
