src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounRoot !!= @CODE@
redaksuunikomitea:redaksuuni#komitea n_21_oi_AO_even ;
valituskomitea:valitus#komitea n_21_oi_AO_even ;
komedija:komedija n_21_oi_AO_even ;
värväämiskampanja:värväämis#kampanja n_21_oi_AO_odd ;
itaalia:itaalia n_21_oi_AO_even ;
kansanmelodia:kansan#melodia n_21_oi_AO_even ;
lintukolonia:lintu#kolonia n_21_oi_AO_even ;
ateria:ateria n_21_oi_AO_even ;
empatia:empatia n_21_oi_AO_even ;
topografia:topografia n_21_oi_AO_odd ;
alkuhistooria:alku#histooria n_21_oi_AO_even ;
histooria:histooria n_21_oi_AO_even ;
polletija:polletija n_21_oi_AO_even ;
kulkkiija+Dial/Por:kulkkiija n_21_oi_AO_odd ;
mukkakävviijä:mukka#kävviijä n_21_oi_ÄÖ_odd ;
muurinsärkkiijä:muurin#särkkiijä n_21_oi_ÄÖ_odd ;
kävynpurriija:kävyn#purriija n_21_oi_AO_odd ;
opiskelliija:opiskelliija n_21_oi_AO_odd ;
tappeliija:tappeliija n_21_oi_AO_even ;
kväänitaitheiliija:kvääni#taitheiliija n_21_oi_AO_even ;
virrankatkasiija:virran#katkasiija n_21_oi_AO_even ;
ihhailiija:ihhailiija n_21_oi_AO_even ;
miljöönsuojeliija:miljöön#suojeliija n_21_oi_AO_even ;
staatinhallittiija:staatin#hallittiija n_21_oi_AO_even ;
valittiija:valittiija n_21_oi_AO_even ;
varttiija:vartiija n_21_oi_AO_odd ;
halttii+Err/Orth:haltia n_21_oi_AO_odd ;
kaljakka:kaljakka n_21_oi_AO_odd ;
purutupakka:puru#tupakka n_21_oi_AO_odd ;
masurkka:masurkka n_21_oi_AO_odd ;
kurmikka:kurmikka n_21_oi_AO_odd ;
lehmävasikka:lehmä#vasikka n_21_oi_AO_odd ;
lusikka:lusikka n_21_oi_AO_odd ;
koiranmustikka:koiran#mustikka n_21_oi_AO_odd ;
tammukka:tammukka n_21_oi_AO_odd ;
mustaruottukka:musta#ruottukka n_21_oi_AO_odd ;
nutukat:nutukka n_21_oi_AO_odd_pl ;
apuketarat:apu#ketara n_21_oi_AO_odd_pl ;
käsitavarat:käsi#tavara n_21_oi_AO_odd_pl ;
kallokat:kallokka n_21_oi_AO_odd_pl ;
kalsukka:kalsukka n_21_oi_AO_odd ;
kalsukat:kalsukka n_21_oi_AO_odd_pl ;
katankat:katankka n_21_oi_AO_odd_pl ;
sistikkä:sistikkä n_21_oi_ÄÖ_odd ;
sistikät:sistikkä n_21_oi_ÄÖ_odd_pl ;
lompola:lompola n_21_oi_AO_odd ;
ajatusmailma:ajatus#mailma n_21_oi_AO_even ;
paradigma:paradigma n_21_oi_AO_even ;
marina:marina n_21_oi_AO_odd ;
etana:etana n_21_oi_AO_odd ;
latina:latina n_21_oi_AO_odd ;
akkuna:akkuna n_21_oi_AO_odd ;
faalumakkara:faalu#makkara n_21_oi_AO_odd ;
industriitavara:industrii#tavara n_21_oi_AO_odd ;
hautakukkura:hauta#kukkura n_21_oi_AO_odd ;
karitta:karitt2a n_21_oi_AO_odd ;
ilmivalkkee:ilmi#valkke n_31_ee ; ! Laitoin adjektiiveihin
kytömävalkkee:kytömä#valkke n_31_ee ;
valkkee:valkke n_31_ee ; !!= * @CODE@ Is noun, bål
mettäaukkee:mettä#aukke n_31_ee ;
yöpimmee:yö#pimme n_31_ee ;
kantamakippee:kantamakippe n_31_ee ;
pimmee:pimme n_31_ee ;
rantarämmee:ranta#rämme n_31_ee ;
rämmee:rämme n_31_ee ;
revyy:revy n_31_yy ;
lippee:lippe n_31_ee ;
elläävähoppee:elläävä#hoppe n_31_ee ;
hoppee:hoppe n_31_ee ;
häppee:häppe n_31_ee ;
ideologia:ideologia n_21_oi_AO_even ;
strategia:strategia n_21_oi_AO_even ;
teoria:teoria n_21_oi_AO_even ;
geometria:geometria n_21_oi_AO_even ;
sormikot:sormikko n_21_oi_pl ;
maalikot:maalikko n_21_oi_pl ;
pahkilot:pahkilo n_21_oi_pl ;
bakteeria:bakteeria n_21_oi_AO_even ;
famiilia+Err/Orth:familiä n_21_oi_ÄÖ_even ;
fryyseriä:fryyseriä n_21_oi_ÄÖ_even ;
jylinä:jylinä n_21_oi_ÄÖ_odd ;
feeriä:feeriä n_21_oi_ÄÖ_odd ;
daatankäsittelliijä:daatan#käsittelliijä n_21_oi_ÄÖ_odd ;
mietiskelliijä:mietiskelliijä n_21_oi_ÄÖ_odd ;
pahantekkiijä:pahan#tekkiijä n_21_oi_ÄÖ_odd ;
rakenustyöntekkiijä:rakenustyön#tekkiijä n_21_oi_ÄÖ_odd ;
pölynimmiijä:pölyn#immiijä n_21_oi_ÄÖ_odd ;
käsityötekkiijä:käsityö#tekkiijä n_21_oi_ÄÖ_odd ;
tekkiijä:tekkiijä n_21_oi_ÄÖ_odd ;
märettiijä:märettiijä n_21_oi_ÄÖ_even ;
näytteliijä:näytteliijä n_21_oi_ÄÖ_even ;
kyseliijä:kyseliijä n_21_oi_ÄÖ_even ;
käveliijä:käveliijä n_21_oi_ÄÖ_even ;
miljöötyöteliijä:miljöö#työteliijä n_21_oi_ÄÖ_even ;
työteliijä:työteliijä n_21_oi_ÄÖ_even ;
eeskävijä:ees#kävijä n_21_oi_ÄÖ_odd ;
kävijä:kävijä n_21_oi_ÄÖ_odd ;
kalanpenikkä:kalan#penikkä n_21_oi_ÄÖ_odd ;
koiranpenikkä:koiran#penikkä n_21_oi_ÄÖ_odd ;
mursunpenikkä:mursun#penikkä n_21_oi_ÄÖ_odd ;
karhuunpenikkä:karhuun#penikkä n_21_oi_ÄÖ_odd ;
sijanpenikkä:sijan#penikkä n_21_oi_ÄÖ_odd ;
räätikkä:räätikkä n_21_oi_ÄÖ_odd ;
hyysikkä:hyysikkä n_21_oi_ÄÖ_odd ;
mietintä:mietintä n_21_oi_ÄÖ_odd ;
vispilä:vispilä n_21_oi_ÄÖ_odd ;
kynttilä:kynttilä n_21_oi_ÄÖ_odd ;
jyrinä:jyrinä n_21_oi_ÄÖ_odd ;
